District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.03

Civil cause of action.

An aggrieved owner, tenant, or tenant organization may seek enforcement of any right or provision under this chapter through a civil action in law or equity, and, upon prevailing, may seek an award of costs and reasonable attorney fees. In an equitable action, the public policy of this chapter favors the waiver of bond requirements to the extent permissible under law or court rule.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 503, 27 DCR 2975
This section is referenced in § 42-3404.02, § 42-3404.02a, § 42-3405.03a, § 42-3405.03b, and § 42-3405.06.
1981 Ed., § 45-1653.
Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.